Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1311
Interfering with a public service company; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of interfering with a public service company if he willfully and purposely interrupts or interferes with the transmission of telegraph or telephone messages or the transmission of light, heat and power in this state.

(2) Interference with public service companies is a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 295.